Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-463
Warrant officer, noncommissioned officer; insubordination.

Any warrant officer or enlisted member who:

(1) Strikes or assaults a warrant officer or noncommissioned officer while that officer is in the execution of his office;

(2) Willfully disobeys the lawful order of a warrant officer or noncommissioned officer; or

(3) Treats with contempt or is disrespectful in language or deportment toward a warrant officer or noncommissioned officer while that officer is in the execution of his office, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 63, p. 1577.